Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Couples counseling" means couples marriage counseling or
couples therapy that focuses on improving the relationship and
marriage between two individuals. This shall include, but is not
limited to, couples counseling obtained through a trained therapist,
licensed doctor, or religious leader; and

Req. No. 12420 Page 1

2. "Taxpayer" means a natural person who is legally married at
the time of incurring costs for obtaining couples counseling as
defined by this act.
B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the costs incurred for obtaining couples
counseling.
C. The credit authorized by this act shall not be used to
reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero
(0).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.

60-1-12420 AO 02/10/25










Req. No. 12420 Page 2